test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-basic_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Verb - lahem: # 
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lehem
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: lahesh
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lahet
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lahem
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: laheni
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: lahen
    lahem+V+Ind+Prs+Inf: lahem
